Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-611. Domestic federal service — Definition.

As used in this section, “domestic federal service” means service rendered as a teacher or administrator in any school or similar institution located on a military base or installation that is administered by the United States Department of Defense.

From and after January 1, 2003, an active member shall be eligible upon application to purchase domestic federal service to be credited as service under this section under the following conditions:

The domestic federal service credit to be granted shall be limited to service for which no benefit could be paid by a retirement system similar in purpose to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System except Social Security if the member left on deposit his or her contributions to the other system, and it shall be limited to ten (10) years;

For each year of domestic federal service credit granted, the member shall pay to the system the employee and employer contributions based on the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits.

The payment is credited to the member's account in the members' deposit account and is in addition to regular member contributions;

The domestic federal service shall not become credited service under this system until:

The member payment under this section has been paid in full; and

The member has established five (5) or more years of actual service exclusive of domestic federal service.

If a member ceases to be an active member before the domestic federal service has been established as system-credited service, the member payments contributed under this section shall be refunded to the member;

The benefit program to be applied to each year of service credit being granted shall be the benefit program in effect at the time of retirement; and

The other rules consistent with this section as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may from time to time adopt.

An active member may purchase a fraction of a year of domestic federal service to be credited as service under this subchapter in the manner as provided for domestic federal service under subsection (b) of this section if the service meets the following requirements:

The member has not less than one-fourth (¼) year of domestic federal service in a fiscal year under § 24-7-601; and

The fraction of a year of domestic federal service may be credited in keeping with policies as provided by § 24-7-601.

However, the board shall not implement this section until the system has reduced its unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years to a level less than the standards prescribed for those public retirement systems under §§ 24-1-104 and 24-1-105.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1479, § 1; 2009, No. 468, § 14; 2011, No. 69, § 21; 2011, No. 974, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 2890.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “together with regular interest thereon” following “refundable” in (b)(3)(B)(ii).

The 2011 amendment by No. 69 added “the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits” at the end of (b)(2)(A); deleted (b)(2)(A)(i) and (ii); deleted former (b)(2)(B) and (C) and redesignated former (b)(2)(D) as present (b)(2)(B); substituted “under this section” for “specified in subdivision (b)(2) of this section” in (b)(3)(A) and (b)(3)(B)(ii); and substituted “refunded to the member” for “refundable” in (b)(3)(B)(ii).

The 2011 amendment by No. 974 substituted “one-fourth (¼) year” for “thirty (30) days” and inserted “under § 24-7-601” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(5).

24-7-612. Service credit purchase.

A member who purchases service credit in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall pay the actuarial equivalent of both the employee and employer contributions, as calculated by the system.

If a member has an existing service purchase account with the system before July 1, 2011, the member shall pay the balance of the account to the system according to the payment schedule agreed upon by the member and the system.

The member shall agree to a reasonable payment schedule with the system on or before June 30, 2012, or the member payments, if any, shall be returned to the member by the system without interest on the member payments as allowed by law.

The service purchase account shall be closed after the system has returned the member payments.

Beginning July 1, 2011, service purchase accounts shall not be created for the purchase of service credit in the system.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may promulgate rules regarding service purchase accounts consistent with this section.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 69, § 13.